Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 32

Improvements by Special Assessment

7-32-101. Chapter definitions — Powers of municipalities.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assessed value basis” means the apportionment of the applicable cost according to the ratio that the assessed value of the individual parcels of property bears to the total assessed value of all such properties at such time as is determined by the legislative body;

“Benefits received basis” means the apportionment of the applicable costs according to an equitable determination by the legislative body of the municipality of the special benefit received by the individual parcel of property from the public facility, taking into account any of the following factors: square footage of parcels or anticipated improvements, or both, front footage, assessed value, type of use, business classification, property location, zones of benefit or a combination of such factors;

“City clerk” or comparable official includes the clerk or other officer who maintains the records of a municipality;

“Fair basis” means assessed value basis, square foot basis, or benefits received basis;

“Public facility” means roads, streets, sidewalks, utilities, including electrical, gas, water and wastewater improvements, related improvements, parking facilities, parks and greenways and any improvements for public safety, including police and fire stations;

“Mayor” of a municipality in this chapter includes the chief executive officer of any municipality;

“Municipality” or “city” means any town, city, metropolitan government or county;

“Square foot basis” means the apportionment of the applicable costs according to the ratio that the square footage of the individual parcels of property or the buildings expected to be constructed on the property bears to the square footage of all the property or the buildings expected to be constructed on the property; and

“Treasurer” includes the finance director or other chief financial officer of the municipality.

The municipalities whose charters do not contain specific provisions to the contrary, or otherwise, have the power to design, or cause to be designed, contract for, and execute, or cause to be executed, the construction and improvement or the reconstruction or reimprovement of any street, avenue, alley, highway, or other public place, by opening, extending, widening, grading, paving, macadamizing, curbing, guttering, draining, or otherwise improving any street, avenue, alley, highway, or other public place, in such manner and with such materials and with such culverts and drains as the legislative body of such municipality may prescribe, and to cause not less than two thirds (2/3) of the cost or expense of the work and improvements mentioned in this subsection (b) to be assessed against the property abutting or adjacent to the street, avenue, alley, or any other public place so improved.

The municipalities described in subsection (b) shall also have the power to design, or cause to be designed, contract for, execute, or cause to be executed, improvements or alterations for flood control, water management, soil erosion, and disaster relief and to cause not less than two thirds (2/3) of the cost or expense of the work and improvements mentioned in this subsection (c) not paid by federal funds to be assessed against property within the flood plain in which the improvements or alterations are made.

Notwithstanding any local charter provision or other law to the contrary, the legislative body of any municipality may approve the transfer to the municipality of a public facility or property to be improved as a public facility that has been acquired, improved or constructed by a third party, including a private entity, or enter into an agreement with a private entity under which the private entity agrees to pay all or a portion of the costs of a public facility being constructed by the municipality; provided, that, in either case, the municipality reasonably anticipates that private investment of not less than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) will be made on property benefitted by the public facility.

The transfer of any public facility or agreement for a third party to pay costs relating to a public facility shall be documented by written agreement between the municipality and the other party or parties thereto, and the agreement shall be approved in substantially final form by the legislative body of the municipality. The agreement may provide that payment of any amounts under the agreement by the municipality may be contingent upon the availability of funds from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to § 7-33-121, and the agreement may also provide that the obligation of a private entity to pay a portion of the cost of a public facility may be reduced to the extent proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to § 7-33-121 are available for such purpose. The mayor of the municipality shall submit the proposed form of the agreement to the legislative body for approval. As a condition to entering into an agreement, the legislative body shall determine that the municipality and the citizens of the municipality will receive a public benefit from entering into the agreement. Before approving any such agreement and the assessment of any portion of any costs to be incurred under the agreement pursuant to § 7-32-115, the legislative body of the municipality shall hold a public hearing relating to the proposed agreement and assessment.

Notice of the public hearing shall be published by the mayor of the municipality in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least two (2) weeks prior to the date of the public hearing. The notice shall include the time, place and purpose of the public hearing and notice of how the proposed form of the agreement and a map of the area that is proposed to be subject to assessment pursuant to § 7-32-115 can be viewed by the public and the date the documents will be available for review, which shall be no later than one (1) week prior to the date of the hearing. Additionally, the notice shall be mailed by the mayor of the municipality or the mayor's designee via certified mail to each owner of property proposed to be subject to assessment at the address of the owner on the records of the assessor of property of the county in which the property is located. The notice may be combined with the notice of assessment required by § 7-32-115(b).

The municipality may pay consideration for any transfer of a public facility pursuant to this subsection (d). The amount of the consideration and the terms of payment for the consideration shall be set forth in the agreement described in subdivision (d)(2); however, the consideration may not exceed the cost documented by the transferring party of acquiring, improving or constructing the public facility, including any costs incurred in the acquisition of the land on which the public facility is or will be located; provided, however, that the municipality may pay the appraised value for the acquisition of real property to be used in connection with public facilities to be constructed or improved by the municipality or other governmental entity. The consideration shall be payable in the manner agreed upon between the municipality and the transferor or transferors of the public facilities and may be payable in the installments and at the times agreed upon by the municipality and the transferor or transferors. Additionally, a municipality may agree as additional consideration for the transfer of a public facility to reimburse the transferor or transferors or a public facility for expenditures made by the transferor or transferors to improve existing public facilities in order to facilitate the construction of the public facility being sold or to connect the public facility being sold to existing public facilities; however, the amount of the reimbursement may not exceed the actual documented cost of the expenditures.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, §§ 7-32-102 — 7-32-114 shall not apply to the acquisition, improvement or construction of any public facilities pursuant to this subsection (d) or § 7-32-115(b) or any assessments relating to the acquisition, improvement or construction.

The authority granted to municipalities by this subsection (d) shall not be construed to limit in any manner the authority of any municipality to acquire a public facility or any other property or enter into any agreement with another party in accordance with other law or any local charter.

Any action taken by the legislative body under this chapter relating to any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection (d) or any assessments under § 7-32-115 or any matters relating thereto may be by resolution, adopted at a meeting, regular or special, of the legislative body at which the resolution is introduced and shall take effect immediately upon adoption. Except as specifically provided in this subsection (d), the resolution need not be published or posted or be subject to veto by the municipality's mayor, nor shall the resolution require for its passage more than a majority vote of all members of the legislative body then in office. Any property that is subject to assessment pursuant to § 7-32-115 shall be specifically identified in the resolution that is adopted approving any such assessment. In approving the property that is to be subject to assessment, the legislative body may remove, but not add, any properties to those identified in the map of the properties that are subject to public view prior to the public hearing required as described in subdivision (d)(2).

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 1; Shan., § 1991a1; mod. Code 1932, § 3408; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1101; Acts 2001, ch. 267, § 1; 2007, ch. 493, § 1; 2008, ch. 971, § 1; 2009, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See §1-1-116.

Acts 2009, ch. 489, § 9 provided that the act, which amended §§7-32-101,7-32-115,7-32-129,7-32-133,7-32-138 and7-33-121, shall apply to all agreements and assessments entered into or imposed pursuant to §7-32-101(d) and §7-32-115(b) on or after July 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Bonds for improvements based on assessed values of benefited properties, §§7-33-301 —7-33-305.

Improvements by city manager-commission charter city, §6-19-101.

Flood control authorities, title 64, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Special Assessments, §§ 3, 7.

Law Reviews.

Impact Fees in Tennessee, a Public and Private Partnership (Andrea C. Barach, Jane Pine Wood), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 685 (1988).

7-32-102. Ordinance for improvement.

When the legislative body of any municipality shall determine to construct any improvement authorized by §7-32-101, it shall adopt an ordinance that such improvement or improvements shall be made, which ordinance shall describe the nature and extent of the work, the character of materials to be used, the location and the terminal points of the proposed improvements, and the flood plain, streets, alleys, highways, or other public places, or part or parts thereof, on which such improvements are to be made, and which shall direct that full details, drawings, plans, specifications, and surveys of the work and estimates be prepared by the city engineer, or such other person as may be designated in the ordinance; or the legislative body may adopt plans for such work already prepared.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 2; Shan., § 1991a2; mod. Code 1932, § 3409; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1102; Acts 2001, ch. 267, § 2.

7-32-103. Filing of documents.

Details, drawings, plans, specifications, and estimates shall, when completed, be placed on file in the office of the city engineer, or other official designated in the ordinance, where the property owners who may be affected by such improvement may see and examine the details, drawings, plans, specifications, and estimates.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 2; Shan., § 1991a3; Code 1932, § 3410; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1103.

7-32-104. Appointment of time to hear objections.

The ordinance shall appoint a time when the legislative body of the municipality shall meet, which shall not be less than two (2) weeks after the date of the first publication of notice of the ordinance, to hear any objections or remonstrances that may be made to the improvement, the manner of making objections, or the character of material to be used.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 2; Shan., § 1991a4; Code 1932, § 3411; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1104.

7-32-105. Notice of ordinance and hearing of objections.

Notice of the adoption of an ordinance shall be given by publishing a notice once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. It shall not be necessary to set out in full in the notice the ordinance, but the notice shall state the character of the improvement or improvements, the location and terminal points of the improvements, and also the time and place, not less than two (2) weeks from the date of first publication of the notice, at which the legislative body of the municipality shall meet to hear remonstrances or protests against the making of the improvement or improvements.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 2; Shan., §§ 1991a5, 1991a6; Acts 1921 Private, ch. 526, § 1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3412, 3413; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1105.

Collateral References.

“Owner,” scope and import of term in statutes as to giving notice of making of local improvements. 2 A.L.R. 790, 95 A.L.R. 1085.

7-32-106. Hearing of objections — Final action on ordinance.

At the time and place appointed, pursuant to §7-32-105, the legislative body shall meet, and at the meeting, or at the time and place to which the meeting may be adjourned from time to time, all persons whose property may be affected by the improvement or improvements may appear in person or by attorney or by petition and protest against the making of such improvement or improvements, the material to be used, and the manner of making improvement or improvements; and the legislative body shall consider such objections and protests, if any, and may confirm, amend, modify, or rescind the original ordinance. Failure to object or protest at the time of confirmation of the original ordinance shall constitute a waiver of any and all irregularities, omissions, and defects in the proceedings taken prior to such a time.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 2; Shan., §§ 1991a7, 1991a8; Code 1932, §§ 3414, 3415; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1106.

Cross-References. Waiver of objection to assessment, §7-32-124.

7-32-107. Undertaking work — Construction contract.

Upon the confirmation of the ordinance, it shall be the duty of the legislative body to proceed to construct the improvements thus authorized, which may be done by contract with the lowest and best responsible bidder, in accordance with the charter of such city or town, or it may be done by the municipality, as it may elect.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 3; Shan., § 1991a9; Code 1932, § 3416; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1107.

7-32-108. Security required of bidders.

In case the work is let to the lowest and best responsible bidder, all bids submitted for the construction of an improvement shall be accompanied by a certified check or a suitable bond, with at least two (2) good and solvent sureties, who are citizens or residents of the city or town where the improvement is to be done; or in lieu of personal sureties, the bond of some surety company authorized to do business in this state may be given in a penal sum of at least ten percent (10%) of the entire cost of the work to be done or improvements to be made, computed on the basis of the bid submitted, and conditioned that the contractors named in the bid shall, in case the work is awarded to them, enter into a contract with the city or town within the time required and for the price named in their respective bids, and in accordance with the plans and specifications of the municipality and the ordinance providing for the improvement.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 3; Shan., § 1991a10; Code 1932, § 3417; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1108.

7-32-109. Rejection of bids — Rebidding.

The legislative body has the power to reject any and all bids and to order new bids.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 3; Shan., § 1991a11; Code 1932, § 3418; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1109.

7-32-110. Contractor's performance bond.

The successful bidder shall execute a bond to the city or town, in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the entire contract price of the improvement, conditioned that the party shall well and truly perform all of the terms and conditions of the contract, in a good and workmanlike manner, and in accordance with the plans and specifications, which shall form part of the contract, and shall indemnify and hold the city harmless from all losses, costs, and expenses that it may sustain by reason of any negligence or default of such contractor.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 3; Shan., § 1991a12; mod. Code 1932, § 3419; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1110.

7-32-111. Costs borne by railway.

Should there be a street, electric, interurban or steam railroad track or tracks on any street, alley, avenue, or highway improved under this chapter, the cost of such improvement between the rails and the spaces between such tracks and eighteen inches (18") beyond the outer rail, including switches and turnouts, shall be paid by the owners of such railroad, and shall be assessed and collected from such owner, and shall be a lien upon the railroad and the property used in connection with the railroad and the property; provided, that where any such railroad shall occupy any street, alley, or highway under ordinance or contract with the municipality, it shall pay or improve according to such ordinance or contract, as is provided in §7-32-113.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 14; Shan., § 1991a62; mod. Code 1932, § 3469; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1111.

Collateral References.

Liability of street railway that paves or is liable for paving occupied portion of street to assessment for improvement of remainder. 29 A.L.R. 679.

Parkway occupied by street railway company as assessable for street improvements. 10 A.L.R. 164.

7-32-112. Replacement of railway rails.

When any of the improvements authorized by this chapter have been directed to be done by ordinance, as provided in this chapter, the legislative body of such city has the power to require any street or other railroad company to replace the rails that such company may have in such streets with other rails of a kind to be specified by the legislative body, when, in the judgment of the legislative body, the rails ordered to be removed are not suitable to be used with paving that is about to be put down by the body. Should the company refuse to comply with the requirements of the notice, the legislative body has the right, and it shall be its duty, to institute suitable legal proceedings against the company to compel and require the company to lay and replace the rails as are thus specified; and if successful in such legal proceedings, the city shall be entitled to recover from such company any and all costs, expenses, and losses incurred by it because of such refusal and failure of such company to comply with such order.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 20; Shan., § 1991a68; mod. Code 1932, § 3475; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1112.

7-32-113. Ascertainment of railway's intent.

When any street, highway, avenue, or alley to be improved has located in the street, highway, avenue, or alley the track or tracks of any street railway, interurban railway, or commercial railway company that has agreed to pave any portion of the street, highway, avenue, or alley, and by the terms of its agreement has the option of either doing the work of paving in accordance with the plans and specifications prepared by such city, or of permitting the city or town to do the work at a price to be paid to the city or town by the company, it is the duty of the legislative body, before enacting the ordinance or ordinances providing for the improvement, to ascertain whether the company desires to do its portion of the paving itself or that the same be done by the municipality.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 5; Shan., § 1991a17; mod. Code 1932, § 3424; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1113.

7-32-114. Deduction of cost payable by railway.

If the company elects to have its portion of the paving done by the municipality, then, and before proceeding to apportion the cost of the improvement upon any lots or parcels of ground abutting on or adjacent to the highway, the board shall first deduct from the total of the improvement the amount that should be paid by such company; and after deducting the amount that is to be paid by such street or other railway company, the legislative body shall proceed to apportion two thirds (2/3) of the balance of the cost of such improvement upon the land abutting on and adjacent to such street, highway, avenue, or alley, as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 5; Shan., § 1991a18; Code 1932, § 3425; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1114.

7-32-115. Apportionment by frontage among property owners.

After the completion of the work or improvement, it shall be the duty of the legislative body, in conformity with the requirements of the ordinance, to apportion at least two thirds (2/3) of the cost of such improvement not paid by federal funds upon the land within the flood plain or abutting on or adjacent to the street, highway, avenue, alley, or other public place, which apportionment shall be made against the land, and the several lots or parcels of the land, according to the frontage of the lots or parcels on the street, highway, avenue, or alley.

If a municipality enters into an agreement pursuant to § 7-32-101(d), the legislative body of the municipality may apportion the costs incurred by the municipality under the agreement and all other costs authorized by this subsection (b) among each parcel of property that is determined by the legislative body to directly benefit from the public facilities that are the subject of the agreement on a fair basis, as defined in § 7-32-101, and shall levy an assessment on each parcel of property of the amount so apportioned.

In addition to amounts authorized to be apportioned and assessed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), the municipality may also apportion and assess the following costs in connection with the assessment:

Costs incurred by the municipality or other public entity at the request of the other party to the agreement entered into pursuant to § 7-32-101(d) to pay costs of public facilities that will benefit the property subject to assessment;

All costs relating to the issuance of bonds or other obligations pursuant to § 7-33-121 including interest expense and such amounts as the municipality deems necessary to pay capitalized interest on the bonds to the extent permitted by applicable law and to fund reserve funds to secure the payment of the bonds or other obligations; and

All other fiscal, legal and administrative expenses of the municipality relating to the agreement entered into pursuant to § 7-32-101(d), any assessment under this chapter or any related financing. A municipality's determination that public facilities benefit the property subject to assessment under this chapter shall be conclusive.

If a municipality levies assessments with respect to parcels of properties pursuant to this subsection (b), the municipality shall also be authorized to levy an annual assessment as to those parcels, without any further authorization from the governing body of the municipality, in the same proportion as the assessments are levied pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) to pay the costs reasonably estimated by the municipality to be incurred in connection with the administration and collection of the assessments.

The legislative body of the municipality is authorized to adopt such policies and procedures as the legislative body deems appropriate to administer assessments imposed under this subsection (b), including, but not limited to, policies relating to the rate and methodology governing the implementation of the assessment. The policies and procedures may also address such matters as the reapportionment of assessments upon the request of property owners, reallocation of assessments upon subdivision of property, credits against assessment payments based upon other available funds, including earnings on reserve funds, maintenance of an assessment roll and procedures for the prepayment of assessments.

A municipality may levy a maximum assessment under this subsection (b) based upon the estimated cost of the public facilities and other permitted costs being assessed, and, in such case, the amount of the assessment shall be reduced by the municipality once the actual costs are established by the municipality and may provide that assessments may become effective at different periods of time to take into account when the costs being assessed will be incurred. The legislative body of the municipality may also provide that assessments shall only be effective upon any issuance of bonds or other obligations pursuant to § 7-33-121.

Each person owning property affected by the levy of an assessment shall receive written notice of:

The method of apportionment of the assessment; and

The amount of the assessment allocated to the owner's parcel.

The notice shall be delivered by certified mail to the address listed on the records of the assessor of property of the county in which the property is located.

For purposes of apportioning and assessing costs pursuant to this subsection (b), §§ 7-32-116 — 7-32-118 and § 7-32-121(c) shall not be applicable.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 4; Shan., § 1991a13; Code 1932, § 3420; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1115; Acts 2001, ch. 267, § 3; 2007, ch. 493, § 2; 2008, ch. 971, § 1; 2009, ch. 489, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See §1-1-116.

Acts 2009, ch. 489, § 9 provided that the act, which amended §§7-32-101,7-32-115,7-32-129,7-32-133,7-32-138 and7-33-121, shall apply to all agreements and assessments entered into or imposed pursuant to §7-32-101(d) and §7-32-115(b) on or after July 1, 2007.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Special Assessments, § 8.

Collateral References.

Eminent domain: consideration of fact that landowner's remaining land will be subject to special assessment in fixing severance damages. 59 A.L.R.3d 534.

Widening of city street as local improvement justifying special assessment of adjacent property. 46 A.L.R.3d 127.

7-32-116. Limitation on aggregate amount of assessment.

The aggregate amount of the levy or assessment made against any lot or parcel of land shall not exceed one half (½) of the cash value of the lot and improvements on the lot.

By cash value, it is the intent of this section to mean the fair sale price of the lot and improvements on the lot if sold at a voluntary sale.

The city or town shall pay any part of the levy or assessment against any such lot or parcel of land as may be in excess of one half (½) of the cash value of the lot or parcel of land.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 4; Shan., § 1991a14; Code 1932, § 3421; Acts 1951, ch. 94, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1116.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Special Assessments, § 8.

7-32-117. Apportionment of cost of intersection improvements.

Where intersections of any street, avenue, or other highway are improved, the municipality shall pay one third (1/3) of the cost of the improvement, and the balance shall be assessed against the property of the street improved and the intersecting street or streets for one half (½) a block in all directions according to the frontage of the property; provided, that the cost to be assessed against railways having tracks within such intersections shall be deducted from the cost of such intersections to be paid by the municipality and property owners.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 4; Shan., § 1991a15; Code 1932, § 3422; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1117.

7-32-118. Property owners bearing entire cost.

In the event a petition is presented to the legislative body of the municipality averring the willingness of each of the signers to pay their pro rata share of the entire cost of any improvement such as is authorized by this chapter, and relieve the municipality from the payment of any part of the improvement as to any street, highway, or alley, or part or parts thereof, which petition is signed by the owners of at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the frontage of the lots or parcel of land abutting on such street, highway, or alley or part or parts thereof, proposed to be thus improved, such petition may be granted by the legislative body; and then proceedings may be had under this chapter and chapter 33 of this title, the same in all respects as if the improvement had been begun by the legislative body on its own initiative. Bonds may be issued and assessments shall be made, except that the assessments shall, in such event, be made for the entire cost of the improvement, and bonds may be issued for the entire cost instead of assessments being made and bonds being issued for only two thirds (2/3) of the cost of the improvements; provided, that no assessment under this section shall in any event exceed on any lot one half (½) of the assessed value of the lot for municipal taxes for the current year, and all other provisions of this chapter and chapter 33 of this title shall be applicable in respect of any improvement made under this section, except as in this section otherwise expressly provided.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 15; Shan., § 1991a63; Code 1932, § 3470; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1118.

7-32-119. Costs of improvements.

The cost of any improvement contemplated in this chapter shall include the expense of the preliminary and other surveys, the inspection and superintendence of the work, the preparation of plans and specifications, the printing and publishing of notices, resolutions, and ordinances required, including notice of assessment, preparing bonds, interest on bonds, and any other expense necessary for the completion of the improvement; provided, that the cost of any guaranty or maintenance of any work constructed under the terms of this chapter shall not be assessed against the property abutting on or adjacent to street or streets or other ways improved.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 4; Shan., § 1991a16; mod. Code 1932, § 3423; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1119.

Collateral References.

Eminent domain: consideration of fact that landowner's remaining land will be subject to special assessment in fixing severance damages. 59 A.L.R.3d 534.

7-32-120. Water connections.

Before making any of the improvements contemplated in this chapter, the legislative body shall have the power to order the owners of all abutting real estate to connect their several premises with water mains located in the streets or highways adjacent to their several premises; and upon default of the owners for thirty (30) days after such order to make connection, the city may contract for and make the connection aforementioned, at such distances, under such regulations, and in accordance with such specifications as may be prescribed by the legislative body; and the whole cost of each connection shall be assessed against the premises with which the connection is made.

Any number of such connections may be included in one (1) contract, and the cost thereof shall be added to the final levy or assessment made against the property of each lot owner, as hereinbefore provided.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 17; Shan., § 1991a65; Code 1932, § 3472; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1120.

Cross-References. Requiring sewer and water connections, §7-35-201.

7-32-121. Notice of apportionment completion and hearing on objections.

When the legislative body has completed apportionment, the city clerk, or such person as may be designated by the legislative body of the city, shall publish a notice that the assessment list has been completed, and that, on a day named, which shall be not less than ten (10) days after the date of publication of the notice, the city council or board will consider any and all objections to the apportionment that have been filed in the office of the city clerk or person designated.

The notice shall further recite that the lists are in the office of the city clerk or person designated, and may be inspected within business hours and during the time specified by anyone interested.

The notice shall also state the general character of the improvement and the terminal points of the improvement.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 6; Shan., §§ 1991a19, 1991a20; Code 1932, §§ 3426, 3427; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1121.

Cross-References. Notice of new assessment replacing assessment set aside, §7-32-127.

7-32-122. Filing objections to assessments.

All persons whose property it is proposed to assess for the cost of the improvement or any costs incurred pursuant to §7-32-101(d) may, at any time on or before the date named in the notice, and before the meeting of the legislative body, file in writing with the city clerk or person designated any objections or defense to the proposed assessment or to the amount of the assessment.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 6; Shan., § 1991a21; mod. Code 1932, § 3428; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1122; Acts 2007, ch. 493, § 3.

7-32-123. Hearing on assessments and objections.

On the date named in the notice, or at any day to which the meeting may be adjourned or to which consideration of the assessments and the objections to the assessment may be postponed, the legislative body shall hear and consider the assessment and objections to the assessment, and, after so doing, shall confirm, modify, or set aside the assessments as shall be deemed right and proper. If any objections to an assessment to pay costs pursuant to §7-32-101(d) are made, the confirmation of the assessment shall require the unanimous approval of the members of the legislative body present at the meeting at which the objection is considered.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 6; Shan., § 1991a22; Code 1932, § 3429; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1123; Acts 2007, ch. 493, § 4.

7-32-124. Failure to object to assessments.

If no objection to the assessment or the amount of the assessment is filed, or if the property owners fail to appear in person or by attorney and present the objection, the assessment shall be confirmed and made final.

Property owners who do not file objection in writing or protest against the assessment shall be held to have consented to the assessment and are forever barred to attack the regularity, validity, or legality of the assessment.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 6; Shan., §§ 1991a23, 1991a24; Code 1932, §§ 3430, 3431; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1124; Acts 2007, ch. 493, § 5.

Cross-References. Waiver of objections to the improvement, §7-32-106.

7-32-125. Final action on assessments.

The confirmation and final action by the legislative body specified in § 7-32-124 shall be done at a single meeting of the body.

It is hereby declared that the provisions of the charters of the cities in reference to the passage of ordinances shall not be applicable to the action of the bodies in levying such assessments, except that such levy or assessment shall be approved by the mayor, and in the event the mayor refuses to approve or vetoes the levies or assessments, which the mayor shall do as a whole, such levies or assessments shall be passed over the mayor's veto in like manner as ordinances or resolutions are passed over such vetoes.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 6; Shan., § 1991a25; Code 1932, § 3432; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1125.

7-32-126. Appeal on assessments.

When any owner or part owner of any of the lots of lands in the flood plain or abutting on or adjacent to any street, highway, avenue, or alley that is improved or about to be improved as provided in this chapter, and upon or against which lots or lands, levies or assessments have been made for the purpose of paying for such improvement, as has been provided in this chapter, shall be aggrieved by the action of the legislative body of such city in confirming the levies or assessments made by the legislative body as mentioned in this chapter, such owner or person shall have the right to appeal from the action of such legislative body to the circuit court of the county in which such city or town is located; provided, that the owner made objection or protest to the levies or assessments at the time provided for and appointed for objecting to the levies or assessments, such appeal shall be perfected by filing with the clerk of such circuit court a petition setting forth the facts in regard to such levies and assessments and the irregularities or illegal acts in the making of the levies or assessments; and such clerk shall then notify such city or town to deliver a copy of such levies or assessments, and all proceedings had in reference to the levies or assessments, to the clerk of the circuit court, and such case then be docketed for trial as other civil causes at law. The appeal of any individual shall not affect the legality of such levy or assessment as to other property involved in the levies or assessments. Such appeal shall be perfected within thirty (30) days after the final action of the legislative body making such levies or assessments, and if not perfected within this time, the levies or assessments shall be regarded as final, and shall not be reviewed by certiorari, injunctions, bills to quiet title or otherwise by any of the courts.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), an owner of property subject to an assessment may irrevocably waive the owner's right to appeal in the contract for installment payments described in § 7-32-134 or by otherwise evidencing waiver in writing.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 19; Shan., § 1991a67; Code 1932, § 3474; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1126; Acts 2001, ch. 267, § 4; 2007, ch. 493, § 6.

7-32-127. New assessment to replace assessment set aside.

If in any court any final assessment made in pursuance of this chapter is set aside for irregularities, omissions, or defects in the proceedings, then the legislative body of such city may, upon recommendation and notice as required in the making of an original assessment, make a new assessment in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 6; Shan., § 1991a28; Code 1932, § 3435; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1127.

Cross-References. Notice of assessments, §7-32-121.

7-32-128. Correction of errors.

Any error, mistake of name, number of lot, amount, or other irregularity may at any time be corrected; and no such levy or assessment shall ever be declared void or invalid by reason of any error, mistake, or irregularity, but the person aggrieved may have the error, mistake, or irregularity corrected by application to the legislative body of the city or town.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 6; Shan., § 1991a27; Code 1932, § 3434; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1128.